src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v3_ise_inflection
+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>see K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>se%>^V%>v^A K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>e%>v^A K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>se%>^V%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>e%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;  
+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e v12pers_long ; ! aukaisemma
+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3 v12pers_long ; ! aukaisimma
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>^N^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t^U^WG%>t K ; 
!+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>se%>^V%>v^A K ;
!+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>e%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>se%>^V%>v^At K ;
!+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>e%>v^At K ; ! Not sure about the suffix mark placements here. TODO Goes through: aukaisseevat; Missing results: aukasevat, Unexpected results: aukasseevat. This should only be on aukas (s) and not aukais (ss). Also TODO TODO TODO generalize to all v3_ise. In general look at aukas vs aukais generalizing

+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; ! aukaisisin
+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4sim^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+Pass+Cond:%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:e%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:e%>m^Al^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATONodd ;
+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen_odd ;

LEXICON v3_lnr !!≈ **@CODE@** ja vartalo on pan-
+Inf:%>^N^A K ; !! * pitää tehdä ^D
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^N%>ee K ;         ! tullee
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>e%>e K ;  ! tulee
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>h^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>ev^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Act+PrfPrc+Der/A+A:%>nee x_21_odd_oblique ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>^N^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
!+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N%>ee%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^N%>ee%>v^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>h^A^An K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t^U^WG%>t K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+Pass+Cond:%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>e^WG%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>e^WG%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>e^WG%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>e^WG%>m^All^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>e^WG%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v3_s !!≈ **@CODE@** kusta, nousta, pestä, päästä ja vartalo on kus-
+Inf:%>t^A K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ee K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>ev^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs:%>e^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>s^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>s^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
!+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t%>ee%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^N%>ee%>v^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t^U^WG%>t K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>e K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+Pass+Cond:%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>e K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>e^WG%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>e^WG%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>e^WG%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>e^WG%>m^All^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>e^WG%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v3piera !!≈ **@CODE@** pierä:pie
+Inf:r^A K ; !! * pitää tehdä ^D
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ree K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>rh^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>rev^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>r%>i3 K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>rthiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>riv^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>rh^A^An K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>rthiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs:%>re^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+Ind+Prt:%>r%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>^N^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>t^U K ; !! * Lyhyt partisiippi
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>rr%>^U%>t K ; 
!+Act+PrfPrc:%>rhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>r PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>^N%>ee%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>r%>^N%>ee%>v^At K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>r%>t^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>r%>t^A%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>r%>e K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>r%>i4sin K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>r%>i4sit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>r%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>r%>i4s K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>r%>i4simm^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>r%>i4sitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>r%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+Pass+Cond:%>r%>t^A%>i4s K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>r%>e K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>r%>kk^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>r%>e^WG%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>r%>e^WG%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>r%>e^WG%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>r%>e^WG%>m^All^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>r%>e^WG%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:e%>m^A MATON ;
+Der+Der/minen:emi n_22_inen ;

LEXICON v3juosta !!≈ **@CODE@** juosta:juo
+Inf:s%>t^A K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ksee K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>sth^A^An K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>ksev^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ksi K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>sthiin K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>ksiv^At K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>sth^A^An K ;
+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>sthiin K ; 
+Act+Ind+Prs:%>kse v12pers_short ;
+Act+Ind+Prt:%>ksi v12pers_short ;
+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:s%>^N^U K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:s%>^N^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>st^U K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>st^U%>t K ; !Täytyy löytää oikean muodon
!+Act+PrfPrc:s%>hee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrfPrc:s%> PRFPRC_OBL ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:ksee%>v^A K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:ksee%>v^At K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>st^A%>v^A K ;
+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>st^A%>v^At K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>kse K ;

+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>ksisin K ; ! juoksisin
+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>ksisit K ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>ksis K ;
+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>ksis K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ksisimm^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>ksisitt^A K ;
+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>stais K ;
+Pass+Cond:%>stais K ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>kse K   ;
+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>sk^A^A K ;

+Act+Inf3+Ine:%>kse%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ela:%>kse%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ill:%>kse%>mh^A^An K ;
+Act+Inf3+Ade:%>kse%>m^All^A K ;
+Act+Inf3+Abe:%>kse%>m^Att^A K ;
+Act+Inf3:%>kse%>m^A MATON ;
+Der+Der/minen:ksemi n_22_inen ;

!! ### Verbiluokat v4...
