src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
kusta+V:kus v3_s ;
pestä+V:pes v3_s ;
päästä+V:pääs v3_s ;
tulla+V:tul v3_lnr ;
panna+V:pan v3_lnr ;
mennä+V:men v3_lnr ;
purra+V:pur v3_lnr ;
surra+V:sur v3_lnr ;
haista+V:hais v3_s ;
nousta+V:nous v3_s ;
piestä+V:pie v3juosta ; ! XXX taipuu kuten juosta, mutta jatkoleksikko ei toimi
juosta+V:juo v3juosta ;
pierä+V:pie v3piera ;
